Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-375
Department; issue certificate of approval; when.

If the department, upon completion of its investigation and the public hearing of the application, is satisfied that such corporation has complied with the requirements of sections 8-356 to 8-384 and department rules and regulations, it shall issue a certificate of approval stating that such corporation has complied with the laws of this state, and granting such savings and loan association the authority to commence business.

Laws 1981, LB 500, § 20.